Washington statutes.
RCW 36.86.090

Logs dumped on right-of-way—Removal—Confiscation.

Logs dumped on any county road right-of-way or in any county road drainage ditch due to hauling equipment failure, or for any other reason, shall be removed within ten days. Logs remaining within any county road right-of-way for a period of thirty days shall be confiscated and removed or disposed of as directed by the boards of county commissioners in the respective counties. Confiscated logs may be sold by the county commissioners and the proceeds thereof shall be deposited in the county road fund.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.86.090. Prior: 1951 c 143 s 1.]